New Jersey, session 221, S3474.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  For the purposes of this section: Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund means the fund established pursuant to section 19 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-19). Green Acres bond act means P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.2007, c.119, P.L.1995, c.204, P.L.1992, c.88, P.L.1989, c.183, P.L.1987, c.265, and P.L.1983, c.354. Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund means the fund established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48). Stewardship activity means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-45). b.  There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the sum of $9,588,905 from the dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for the purpose of providing grants to assist qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes pursuant to subsection c. of this section, to develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes pursuant to subsection d. of this section, and to undertake stewardship activities pursuant to subsection e. of this section. c.     The following projects for the acquisition of lands for recreation and conservation purposes are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to subsection b. of this section: Nonprofit Organization Project County Municipality Approved Amount (1) Friends of Hopewell Valley Open Space Hopewell Valley Park Acq Mercer Hopewell Boro Hopewell Twp Pennington Boro 137,500 (2) Friends of Princeton Open Space Millstone River Watershed Mercer Princeton Boro 140,000 (3) Greater Culver Lake Watershed Conservation Foundation Watershed Protection Program Sussex Frankford Twp 220,000 (4) Hunterdon Land Trust Hunterdon Open Space Plan Priority Areas Hunterdon All municipalities 500,000 (5) New Jersey Conservation Foundation Priority Area Acquisitions Atlantic Buena Vista Twp Egg Harbor City Egg Harbor Twp Estell Manor City Folsom Boro Galloway Twp Hamilton Twp Hammonton Town Mullica Twp Weymouth Twp 1,074,300 Burlington Bass River Twp Beverly City Bordentown City Bordentown Twp Burlington City Burlington Twp Chesterfield Twp Cinnaminson Twp Delanco Twp Delran Twp Evesham Twp Fieldsboro Boro Florence Twp Mansfield Twp Medford Twp New Hanover Twp North Hanover Twp Pemberton Twp Shamong Twp Southampton Twp Springfield Twp Tabernacle Twp Washington Twp Woodland Twp Camden Camden City Merchantville Boro Pennsauken Twp Cape May Lower Twp Middle Twp Cumberland Fairfield Twp Greenwich Twp Hopewell Twp Maurice River Twp Millville City Stow Creek Twp Upper Deerfield Twp Vineland City Gloucester Franklin Twp Logan Twp South Harrison Twp Woolwich Twp Hunterdon All municipalities Mercer East Windsor Twp Ewing Twp Hamilton Twp Hightstown Boro Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Trenton City Princeton Boro Robbinsville Twp West Windsor Twp Middlesex Cranbury Twp Edison Twp Monmouth Allentown Boro Millstone Twp Upper Freehold Twp Morris All municipalities Ocean Lacey Twp Ocean Twp Plumsted Twp Passaic West Milford Twp Salem Alloway Twp Carneys Point Twp Elmer Boro Elsinboro Twp Lower Alloways Creek Twp Mannington Twp Oldmans Twp Pennsville Twp Pilesgrove Twp Pittsgrove Twp Quinton Twp Upper Pittsgrove Twp Woodstown Boro Somerset Bedminster Twp Bernards Twp Bernardsville Boro Branchburg Twp Bridgewater Twp Far Hills Boro Hillsborough Twp Montgomery Twp Peapack-Gladstone Boro Raritan Boro Sussex Andover Twp Byram Twp Frankford Twp Green Twp Hampton Twp Hopatcong Boro Sparta Twp Vernon Twp Wantage Twp Union Elizabeth City Linden City Springfield Twp Union Twp Warren Allamuchy Twp Blairstown Twp Franklin Twp Frelinghuysen Twp Greenwich Twp Hardwick Twp Harmony Twp Hope Twp Independence Twp Knowlton Twp Liberty Twp Lopatcong Twp Mansfield Twp Oxford Twp Pohatcong Twp Washington Twp White Twp (6) Ridgeview Conservancy Ridgeview Conservancy Acquisitions Mercer Hopewell Boro Hopewell Twp Princeton Boro 290,000 Somerset Montgomery Twp (7) South Jersey Land and Water Trust South Jersey Watersheds Atlantic All municipalities 575,000 Camden All municipalities Cape May All municipalities Cumberland All municipalities Gloucester All municipalities Salem All municipalities (8) Tewksbury Land Trust Land Acquisition Hunterdon Tewksbury Twp 450,000 (9) The Land Conservancy of New Jersey Priority Areas Acq Bergen All municipalities 1,675,000 Essex All municipalities Middlesex All municipalities Morris All municipalities Ocean All municipalities Passaic All municipalities Somerset All municipalities Sussex All municipalities Union All municipalities Warren All municipalities (10) The Nature Conservancy Priority Area Acquisition Atlantic Estell Manor City Galloway Twp Hamilton Twp Mullica Twp 500,000 Burlington Bass River Twp Pemberton Boro Pemberton Twp Washington Twp Woodland Twp Cape May Cape May City Cape May Point Boro Dennis Twp Lower Twp Middle Twp West Cape May Boro Cumberland Commercial Twp Downe Twp Fairfield Twp Lawrence Twp Maurice River Twp Millville City Vineland City Gloucester Franklin Twp Ocean Barnegat Twp Eagleswood Twp Lacey Twp Little Egg Harbor Twp Ocean Twp Stafford Twp Passaic North Haledon Boro Wayne Twp Salem Pittsgrove Twp Sussex Andover Boro Andover Twp Frankford Twp Fredon Twp Green Twp Hampton Twp Hardyston Twp Lafayette Twp Montague Twp Newton Town Sandyston Twp Stillwater Twp Walpack Twp Wantage Twp Warren Allamuchy Twp Blairstown Twp Frelinghuysen Twp Hardwick Twp Hope Twp Knowlton Twp (11) The Watershed Institute Watershed Connectors Mercer Hopewell Boro Hopewell Twp Pennington Boro Princeton Boro 140,000 TOTAL $5,701,800 d.    The following projects for the development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to subsection b. of this section: Nonprofit Organization Project County Municipality Approved Amount Camden Community Partnership Elijah Perry Park Improvement Phase II Camden Camden City 484,750 Camp Dill Foundation Camp Dill Improvements Hunterdon Clinton Twp 100,000 Essex County Parks Foundation Monte Irvin Orange Park Improvements Essex Orange City Twp 1,405,080 SPARK Friends Inc. Athletic Facility Improvements at Riverfront Essex Newark City 1,588,275 TOTAL $3,578,105 e.     The following stewardship activity projects are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to subsection b. of this section: Nonprofit Organization Project County Municipality Approved Amount Friends of Passaic County Parks, Inc. Lambert Tower Historic Landscape Passaic Paterson City 300,000 Harding Land Trust Gatehouse and Primrose Phase 2 Morris Harding Twp 9,000 TOTAL $309,000 f.     Any transfer of any funds, or change in project sponsor, site, or type, listed in subsection c., d., or e. of this section shall require the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. g.    To the extent that moneys remain available after the projects listed in subsection c., d., or e. of this section are offered funding pursuant thereto, any project of a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund for recreation and conservation purposes shall be eligible to receive additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. h.    There is reappropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the unexpended balances, due to project withdrawals, cancellations, or cost savings, of the amounts appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund to assist qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, for the purposes of:  (1) this section; and (2) providing additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, to any project of a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund for recreation and conservation purposes, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor.  Any such additional funding provided from a Green Acres bond act may include administrative costs. 2.  There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the sum of $479,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for paying administrative costs associated with administering the applicable provisions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). 3.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), the sum of $10,067,905 to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.